Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.070

Property subject to divestment, etc.

Any interest in property whether vested or not, held by the slayer or abuser, subject to be divested, diminished in any way or extinguished, if the decedent survives him or her or lives to a certain age, shall be held by the slayer or abuser during his or her lifetime or until the decedent would have reached such age, but shall then pass as if the decedent had died immediately thereafter.

[ 2009 c 525 s 7; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.070. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 7.]